Washington statutes.
RCW 11.76.250

Letters after final settlement.

A final settlement of the estate shall not prevent a subsequent issuance of letters of administration, should other property of the estate be discovered, or if it should become necessary and proper from any cause that letters should be again issued.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.76.250. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 180; RRS s 1550; prior: Code 1881 s 1603; 1854 p 304 s 224.]